West Virginia, session 2025, HB2314.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Pharmacy. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 29, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-5-7 of this code, modified by the Board of Pharmacy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 16, 2024, relating to the Board of Pharmacy (regulations governing pharmacy permits, 15 CSR 15), is authorized.